Wyoming, session 2026, HB0149.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 14-3-204(a)(iii)(intro),
21-4-101(a)(v), 21-4-102(b) and 21-4-103 are amended to
read:

14-3-204. Duties of local child protective agency.
HB0149

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0376

(a) The local child protective agency shall:

(iii) Within twenty-four (24) hours after
notification of a suspected case of child abuse or neglect,
initiate an investigation or assessment to verify every
report. The representative of the child protective agency
shall, at the initial time of contact with the individual
subject to a child abuse and neglect investigation or
assessment, advise the individual of the specific
complaints or allegations made against the individual. If
the child is enrolled in a public school, or a private
school as defined by W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iii) other than a
home-based educational program administered by the
individual subject to the investigation or assessment, and
the local child protective agency determines it is in the
best interest of the child, the representative shall advise
the individual that the individual shall not commence
administering a home-based educational program during the
period of investigation or assessment period as provided by
W.S. 21-4-102(b)(ii) and shall report that advice to the
public school or private school where the child is
enrolled. A thorough investigation or assessment and report
HB0149

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0376
of child abuse or neglect shall be made in the manner and
time prescribed by the state agency pursuant to rules and
regulations adopted in accordance with the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act. If the child protective
agency is denied reasonable access to a child by a parent
or other persons and the agency deems that the best
interest of the child so requires, it shall seek an
appropriate court order by ex parte proceedings or other
appropriate proceedings to see the child. The child
protective agency shall assign a report:

21-4-101. Definitions.

(a) For the purposes of this article:

(v) A home-based educational program means a
program of educational instruction provided to a child by
the child's parent or legal guardian, or by a person
designated by the parent or legal guardian, and that is
provided in compliance with the requirements of W.S.
21-4-102(b);

HB0149

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0376
21-4-102. When attendance required; exemptions;
withdrawal.

(b) A home-based educational program shall meet the
requirements of a basic academic educational program
pursuant to W.S. 21-4-101(a)(vi). It shall be the
responsibility of every person administering a home-based
educational program to ensure a curriculum is administered
to pupils in the program that complies with the
requirements of this subsection. The following shall apply
to a person administering a home-based educational program:

(i) No person shall administer a home-based
educational program if the person, or any other person who
is living in the home where the home-based educational
program is administered, has been convicted of any of the
offenses specified under this paragraph within the
immediately preceding seven (7) years. For purposes of this
paragraph, a person shall be deemed to be convicted of an
offense if the person was convicted or pleaded guilty or
nolo contendere. This paragraph shall not apply if the
conviction was reversed or annulled or the person received
HB0149

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0376
a pardon. This paragraph applies to any of the following
offenses:

(A) Any violation of W.S. 6-2-201 or
6-2-202, if the victim was a minor;

(B) Any violation of W.S. 6-2-314 through
6-2-318;

(C) W.S. 6-2-503;

(D) W.S. 6-2-504, if the victim was a
minor;

(E) W.S. 6-4-403;

(F) Any other felony or misdemeanor offense
in which the victim was a minor and the conduct constitutes
abuse as defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii) or neglect as
defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(vii);

(G) Any violation of a state or federal law
that contains the same or similar elements as the offenses
HB0149

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0376
specified in subparagraphs (A) through (F) of this
paragraph.

(ii) No person shall remove a child from
enrollment in a public school, or a private school
administered by another person, and commence the
administration of a home-based educational program for the
child during any period that the person is under
investigation or assessment for child abuse or neglect if
the person was advised not to commence the administration
of a home-based educational program as provided by W.S.
14-3-204(a)(iii). The person may request a hearing before
the office of administrative hearings pursuant to the
Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act on the ability of the
person to commence administering a home-based educational
program under this paragraph. Nothing in this paragraph
shall prohibit a person from continuing to administer a
home-based education program if the person was
administering the home-based educational program prior to
the commencement of the investigation or assessment for
child abuse or neglect.

HB0149

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0376
21-4-103. Enforcement of article; appointment and
compensation of attendance officers.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the primary responsibility for the enforcement of this
article shall be upon the board of trustees of the school
district, which shall appoint an attendance officer or
officers to carry out the provisions of this article. Said
officer shall be paid out of the district treasury such sum
as may be provided in the order of appointment. The primary
responsibility for the enforcement of W.S. 21-4-102(b)(i)
and (ii) regarding criminal background and abuse
investigations shall be the responsibility of the
department of family services or the applicable local law
enforcement agency.

(b) Any person who administers a home-based
educational program in violation of W.S. 21-4-102(b)(i) or
who commences the administration of a home-based
educational program in violation of W.S. 21-4-102(b)(ii) is
guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more
than three (3) years, a fine of not more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000.00), or both.
HB0149

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0376

Section 2. Any person who is administering a
home-based educational program on the effective date of
this act in violation of W.S. 21-4-102(b)(i) shall cease
the administration of the home-based educational program
not later than July 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0149